Washington statutes.
RCW 11.108.030

Pecuniary bequests—Valuation of assets if distribution other than money.

(1) If a governing instrument authorizes the fiduciary to satisfy a pecuniary bequest in whole or in part by distribution of property other than money, the assets selected for that purpose shall be valued at their respective fair market values on the date or dates of distribution, unless the governing instrument expressly provides otherwise. If the governing instrument permits the fiduciary to value the assets selected for the distribution as of a date other than the date or dates of distribution, then, unless the governing instrument expressly provides otherwise, the assets selected by the fiduciary for that purpose shall have an aggregate fair market value on the date or dates of distribution which, when added to any cash distributed, will amount to no less than the amount of that gift as stated in, or determined by, the governing instrument.

(2) A marital deduction gift shall be satisfied only with assets that qualify for those deductions.

[ 1985 c 30 s 108. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 142.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.